Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 686.040, as amended by section 10, chapter 30, Oregon Laws  2024, is amended
to read:
686.040. (1) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to the following:
(a) Commissioned veterinary officers of the United States Army, or those in the employ  of other
United States  Government agencies while engaged in their official capacity, unless they enter into
a private practice.
(b) An individual who has received training to verify whether  cattle are pregnant and is
performing pregnancy verification services on cattle within the scope  of the individual’s
training.
(2) Nothing in ORS 167.322 or 686.020 (1)(a) shall be so construed as to prevent any person or
the agent or employee of the person  from practicing veterinary medicine and surgery or dentistry
in a humane manner on any  animal belonging to the person, agent or employee or for gratuitous
services or from dehorning and vaccinating cattle for the person, agent or employee.
(3) Nothing in ORS 686.020 (1)(a) shall be  so construed as to prevent the selling of veterinary
remedies and instruments by a licensed pharmacist at the regular place  of business of the licensed
pharmacist.
(4) A practitioner of allied health  methods may practice that method on animals without vio-
lating ORS  686.020 (1)(a), as long as the practice is in conformance with laws and rules governing
the practitioner’s practice and the practice is upon referral from a  licensed veterinarian for treat-
ment or therapy specified by the veterinarian.
(5) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to the  lay testing of poultry by the whole blood
agglutination test.
(6) A certified euthanasia technician holding an active, current certificate may inject  sodium
pentobarbital, sedative and analgesic medications and any other euthanasia substance approved  by
the Oregon State Veterinary Medical Examining Board without violating ORS 686.020 (1)(a).
(7) The board by rule may specify circumstances under which  unlicensed persons may give
vaccinations, administer an anesthetic or otherwise assist in the practice of veterinary medicine.
(8) Any individual licensed  as a veterinarian in another state may be used in consultation in this
state with a person  licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state provided the consultation
does not exceed 30 days in any 365 consecutive days.
Enrolled Senate Bill 976 (SB 976-B) Page 1
(9) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to authorized  representatives of the State Department of
Agriculture in the discharge of any duty authorized by the department.
(10) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to an unlicensed representative of a livestock  association,
cow-testing  association,  or poultry association who, for the benefit of the association, takes blood
samples for laboratory tests for the diagnosis of livestock or poultry  diseases, but only if this person
has received authorization from the State Department of Agriculture following a written request  to
the department.
(11) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to persons permitted by the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife to rehabilitate orphaned, sick or injured wildlife, as defined in ORS 496.004, for the purpose
of restoring the animals to the wild.
(12) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to students,  agents or employees of public or private ed-
ucational or medical research institutions involved in educational  or research activities under the
auspices of those institutions.
(13) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to:
(a) Veterinarians employed by Oregon State University;
(b) Instructors of veterinary courses; or
(c) Students of veterinary science who participate in the diagnosis and treatment of animals  if
the students:
(A) Are participating in the diagnosis and treatment of animals while engaged in an  educational
program approved by the board or a college of veterinary medicine accredited by the  American
Veterinary Medical Association; and
(B) Are under the direct supervision of an Oregon licensed veterinarian or a veterinarian  ap-
proved by the board or Oregon State University to supervise students in the educational program.
(14) The State Department of Agriculture shall by rule specify circumstances  under
which unlicensed persons may engage in activities  described in subsection (1)(b) of this sec-
tion.
(15) The department shall inform individuals  authorized to verify whether cattle are
pregnant of the requirement to report livestock diseases as required under ORS 596.321.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 596.321 is amended to read:
596.321. (1) The State Department of Agriculture shall enact rules and regulations:
(a) Containing a list of  livestock diseases that must be reported to the department by any person
practicing veterinary medicine in this state.
(b) Concerning the time and manner of reporting  livestock diseases and any other information
considered reasonably necessary by the department.
(c) Regarding the time and manner of vaccinating female cattle against brucellosis.
(2) Any  person practicing veterinary medicine in this state, having knowledge of the existence
of any livestock disease listed pursuant  to subsection (1) of this section, shall immediately report the
disease to the department in the manner provided by rule or regulation.
(3) For the purposes of this section, “practicing veterinary medicine”  includes individuals
authorized to verify whether cattle are pregnant under ORS 686.040 (1)(b).
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 596.321 and 686.040 by sections 1 and 2 of this  2025
Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 976 (SB 976-B) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 976 (SB 976-B) Page 3